District of Columbia statutes.
26-307

Minimum liquid assets required.

Each applicant shall demonstrate, in a form satisfactory to the Superintendent, [Commissioner] the availability of capital of at least $25,000 for the operation of the business of each location and mobile unit from which the applicant proposes in the application to conduct business. Each licensee shall continuously maintain capital of at least $5,000 for the operation of the business of each location and mobile unit from which the licensee conducts business.

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 8, 45 DCR 1782
This section is referenced in § 26-308 and § 26-316.
1981 Ed., § 26-1107.